Nebraska, session 109, LB426.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB426 LB426
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-724, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-724 It is the responsibility of society to ensure that youth are
given the opportunity to become competent, responsible, patriotic, and
civil citizens to ensure a strong, stable, just, and prosperous America.
Such a citizenry necessitates that every member thereof be knowledgeable
of our nation's history, government, geography, and economic system. The
youth in our state should be committed to the ideals and values of our
country's democracy and the constitutional republic established by the
people. Schools should help prepare our youth to make informed and
reasoned decisions for the public good. Civic competence is necessary to
sustain and improve our democratic way of life and must be taught in all
public, private, denominational, and parochial schools. A central role of
schools is to impart civic knowledge and skills that help our youth to
see the relevance of a civic dimension for their lives. Students should
be made fully aware of the liberties, opportunities, and advantages we
possess and the sacrifices and struggles of those through whose efforts
these benefits were gained. Since young people are most susceptible to
the acceptance of principles and doctrines that will influence them
throughout their lives, it is one of the first duties of our educational
system to conduct its activities, choose its textbooks, and arrange its
curriculum in such a way that the youth of our state have the opportunity
to become competent, responsible, patriotic, and civil American citizens.
(1) The school board of each school district shall, at the beginning
of each calendar year, appoint from its members a committee of three, to
be known as the committee on American civics, which shall:
(a) Hold no fewer than two public meetings annually, at least one
when public testimony is accepted;
(b) Keep minutes of each meeting showing the time and place of the
meeting, which members were present or absent, and the substance and
details of all matters discussed;
-2-

LB426 LB426
2025 2025
(c) Examine and ensure that the social studies curriculum used in
the district is aligned with the social studies standards adopted
pursuant to section 79-760.01 and teaches foundational knowledge in
civics, history, economics, financial literacy, and geography;
(d) Review and approve the social studies curriculum to ensure that
it stresses the services of the men and women who played a crucial role
in the achievement of national independence, establishment of our
constitutional government, and preservation of the union and includes the
incorporation of multicultural education as set forth in sections 79-719
to 79-723 in order to instill a pride and respect for the nation's
institutions and not be merely a recital of events and dates;
(e) Ensure that any curriculum recommended or approved by the
committee on American civics is made readily accessible to the public and
contains a reference to this section;
(f) Ensure that the district develops and utilizes formative,
interim, and summative assessments to measure student mastery of the
social studies standards adopted pursuant to section 79-760.01;
(g) Ensure that the social studies curriculum in the district
incorporates one or more of the following for each student:
(i) Administration of a written test that is identical to the entire
civics portion of the naturalization test used by United States
Citizenship and Immigration Services prior to the completion of eighth
grade and again prior to the completion of twelfth grade with the
individual score from each test for each student made available to a
parent or guardian of such student; or
(ii) Attendance or participation between the commencement of eighth
grade and completion of twelfth grade in a meeting of a public body as
defined by section 84-1409 followed by the completion of a project or
paper in which each student demonstrates or discusses the personal
learning experience of such student related to such attendance or
participation; or
-3-

LB426 LB426
2025 2025
(iii) Completion of a project or paper and a class presentation
between the commencement of eighth grade and the completion of twelfth
grade on a person or persons or an event commemorated by a holiday listed
in subdivision (6) of this section or on a topic related to such person
or persons or event; and
(h) Take all such other steps as will assure the carrying out of the
provisions of this section and provide a report to the school board
regarding the committee's findings and recommendations.
(2) All social studies courses approved for grade levels as provided
by this section shall include and adequately stress contributions of all
ethnic groups to (a) the development and growth of America into a great
nation, (b) art, music, education, medicine, literature, science,
politics, and government, and (c) the military in all of this nation's
wars.
(3) All grades of all public, private, denominational, and parochial
schools, below the sixth grade, shall devote at least one hour per week
to exercises or teaching periods for the following purpose:
(a) The discussion of noteworthy events pertaining to American
history or the exceptional acts of individuals and groups of Americans;
(b) The historical background, memorization, and singing of
patriotic songs such as the Star-Spangled Banner and America the
Beautiful;
(c) The development of respect for the American flag as a symbol of
freedom and the sacrifices of those who secured that freedom; and
(d) Instruction as to proper conduct in the presentation of the
American flag.
(4) All public, private, denominational, and parochial schools may,
as a part of the social studies curriculum, engage students between the
commencement of fifth grade and the completion of eighth grade in a one-
hour American flag education program that includes, but need not be
limited to, the United States Flag Code, the thirteen folds of the
-4-

LB426 LB426
2025 2025
American flag, proper flag etiquette and conduct in the presentation of
the flag, and the historical background of the flag. Such flag education
program may be developed and presented in consultation and partnership
with a local recognized veterans organization as defined in section
80-401.01. As part of such program, each student shall receive one
American flag that is three feet by five feet and a flag etiquette
booklet. The costs of such program shall be funded using lottery funds
pursuant to section 79-3501 or private donations.
(5) (4) In at least two of the three grades from the fifth grade to
the eighth grade in all public, private, denominational, and parochial
schools, time shall be set aside for the teaching of American history
from the social studies curriculum, which shall be taught in such a
manner that all students are given the opportunity to (a) become
competent, responsible, patriotic, and civil citizens who possess a deep
understanding of and respect for both the Constitution of the United
States and the Constitution of Nebraska and (b) prepare to preserve,
protect, and defend freedom and democracy in our nation and our world.
(6) (5) In at least two courses in every high school, time shall be
devoted to the teaching of civics and American history as outlined in the
social studies standards adopted pursuant to section 79-760.01, during
which specific attention shall be given to the following matters:
(a) The Declaration of Independence, the United States Constitution,
the Constitution of Nebraska, and the structure and function of local
government in this state;
(b) The benefits and advantages of representative government, the
rights and responsibilities of citizenship in our government, and the
dangers and fallacies of forms of government that restrict individual
freedoms or possess antidemocratic ideals such as, but not limited to,
Nazism and communism;
(c) The duties of citizenship, which include active participation in
the improvement of a citizen's community, state, country, and world and
-5-

LB426 LB426
2025 2025
the value and practice of civil discourse between opposing interests; and
(d) The application of knowledge in civics, history, economics,
financial literacy, and geography to address societal issues.
(7) (6) Appropriate patriotic exercises suitable to the occasion
shall be held under the direction of the superintendent in every public,
private, denominational, and parochial school on George Washington's
birthday, Abraham Lincoln's birthday, Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr.'s
birthday, Native American Heritage Day, Constitution Day, Memorial Day,
Veterans Day, and Thanksgiving Day, or on the day or week preceding or
following such holiday, if the school is in session.
(8) (7) Every school board, the State Board of Education, and the
superintendent of each school district in the state shall be held
directly responsible in the order named for carrying out this section.
Neglect thereof by any employee may be considered a cause for dismissal.
Sec. 2. Section 79-3501, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-3501 (1) For fiscal years through fiscal year 2023-24, the money
available to be used for education pursuant to subdivision (3)(b) of
section 9-812 shall be transferred to the Nebraska Education Improvement
Fund.
(2) For fiscal years 2024-25 through 2028-29, the money available to
be used for education pursuant to subdivision (3)(b) of section 9-812
shall be transferred as follows:
(a) Eight percent to the Behavioral Training Cash Fund;
(b) Two percent to the College Pathway Program Cash Fund;
(c) Seven percent to the Community College Gap Assistance Program
Fund;
(d) Ten percent to the State Department of Education Improvement
Grant Fund;
(e) Three percent to fund distance education incentives pursuant to
section 79-1337 and flag education programs pursuant to subdivision (4)
-6-

LB426 LB426
2025 2025
of section 79-724;
(f) One percent to the Door to College Scholarship Fund;
(g) Eight percent to the Excellence in Teaching Cash Fund;
(h) One and one-half percent to the Expanded Learning Opportunity
Grant Fund;
(i) One and one-half percent to the Mental Health Training Cash
Fund; and
(j) Fifty-eight percent to the Nebraska Opportunity Grant Fund.
(3) For fiscal year 2029-30 and each fiscal year thereafter, the
money available to be used for education pursuant to subdivision (3)(b)
of section 9-812 shall be transferred as the Legislature may direct.
(4)(a) The Nebraska Education Improvement Fund is created. The fund
shall consist of money transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section and any other funds transferred by the Legislature. The fund
shall be allocated, after actual and necessary administrative expenses,
as provided in this subsection for fiscal years 2016-17 through 2023-24.
A portion of each allocation for fiscal year 2023-24 may be retained by
the agency to which the allocation is made or the agency administering
the fund to which the allocation is made for actual and necessary
expenses incurred by such agency for administration, evaluation, and
technical assistance related to the purposes of the allocation, except
that no amount of the allocation to the Nebraska Opportunity Grant Fund
may be used for such purposes.
(b) For fiscal years 2017-18 through 2023-24, an amount equal to ten
percent of the revenue received by the Nebraska Education Improvement
Fund in the prior fiscal year shall be retained in the fund at all times
plus any interest earned during the current fiscal year. The balance of
the fund on July 26, 2024, less three percent of the money received for
the fourth quarter of fiscal year 2023-24, shall be transferred to the
Behavioral Training Cash Fund.
(c) For fiscal year 2023-24, the Nebraska Education Improvement Fund
-7-

LB426 LB426
2025 2025
shall be allocated as follows:
(i) One percent of the allocated funds to the Expanded Learning
Opportunity Grant Fund to carry out the Expanded Learning Opportunity
Grant Program Act;
(ii) Seventeen percent of the allocated funds to the State
Department of Education Improvement Grant Fund to be used for competitive
innovation grants pursuant to section 79-1054;
(iii) Nine percent of the allocated funds to the Community College
Gap Assistance Program Fund to carry out the community college gap
assistance program;
(iv) Eight percent of the allocated funds to the Excellence in
Teaching Cash Fund to carry out the Excellence in Teaching Act;
(v) Sixty-two percent of the allocated funds to the Nebraska
Opportunity Grant Fund to carry out the Nebraska Opportunity Grant Act in
conjunction with appropriations from the General Fund; and
(vi) Three percent of the allocated funds to fund distance education
incentives pursuant to section 79-1337.
(d) For fiscal year 2029-30 and each fiscal year thereafter, the
Nebraska Education Improvement Fund shall be allocated as the Legislature
may direct.
(e) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(5) A portion of each transfer pursuant to subdivisions (2)(c), (e),
(f), (g), (h), and (i) of this section may be retained by the agency
administering the fund to which such transfer is made for actual and
necessary expenses incurred by such agency for administration,
evaluation, and technical assistance related to the purposes of the
transfer.
(6)(a) On or before September 20, 2022, and on or before each
September 20 thereafter, (i) any department or agency receiving a
-8-

LB426 LB426
2025 2025
transfer or acting as the administrator for a fund receiving a transfer
pursuant to subsection (2) or (4) of this section, (ii) any recipient or
subsequent recipient of money from any such fund, and (iii) any service
contractor responsible for managing any portion of any such fund or any
money disbursed from any such fund on behalf of any entity shall prepare
and submit an annual report to the Auditor of Public Accounts in a manner
prescribed by the auditor for the immediately preceding July 1 through
June 30 fiscal year detailing information regarding the use of such fund
or such money.
(b) The Auditor of Public Accounts shall annually compile a summary
of the annual reports received pursuant to subdivision (6)(a) of this
section, any audits related to transfers pursuant to subsection (2) or
(4) of this section conducted by the Auditor of Public Accounts, and any
findings or recommendations related to such transfers into a consolidated
annual report and shall submit such consolidated annual report
electronically to the Legislature on or before January 1, 2023, and on or
before each January 1 thereafter.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, recipient, subsequent
recipient, or service contractor means a nonprofit entity that expends
funds transferred pursuant to subsection (2) or (4) of this section to
carry out a state program or function, but does not include an individual
who is a direct beneficiary of such a program or function.
(7) On or before December 31, 2027, the Education Committee of the
Legislature shall electronically submit recommendations to the Clerk of
the Legislature regarding how the money used for education from the State
Lottery Operation Trust Fund should be allocated to best advance the
educational priorities of the state for the five-year period beginning
with fiscal year 2029-30.
Sec. 3. Original sections 79-724 and 79-3501, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-9-